Utah statutes.
20A-7-401.   Limitation -- Land use ordinances and budgets.
(1)  The legal voters of any county, city, or town may not initiate:
(a)  a budget or a change in a budget; or
(b)  a land use ordinance or a change in a land use ordinance.
(2)  The legal voters of any county, city, or town may not require any budget
adopted by the local legislative body or the implementation of a land use
ordinance adopted by the local legislative body to be submitted to the voters.
